Louisiana, session 2026, SB100.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 45:201.9 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§201.9. Proof of insurance
A transportation network company driver shall carry written or digital proof
of coverage satisfying R.S. 45:201.6 with him at all times during his use of a vehicle
in connection with a transportation network company's digital network. In the event
of an accident, a transportation network company driver shall provide this insurance
coverage information to the directly interested parties, automobile insurers, and
investigating police officers, upon request pursuant to R.S. 32:863.1. Upon such
request, a transportation network company driver shall also disclose to directly
interested parties, automobile insurers, and investigating police officers, whether he
was logged on to the transportation network company's digital network or on a
prearranged ride at the time of an accident. Failure by a transportation network
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 100 ENROLLED
company driver to comply with any provision of this Section shall subject the
transportation network driver to the provisions of R.S. 32:863.1.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.